Washington statutes.
RCW 9.01.130

Sending letter, when complete.

Whenever any statute makes the sending of a letter criminal, the offense shall be deemed complete from the time it is deposited in any post office or other place, or delivered to any person, with intent that it shall be forwarded; and the sender may be proceeded against in the county wherein it was so deposited or delivered, or in which it was received by the person to whom it was addressed.

[ 1909 c 249 s 22; RRS s 2274.]